Tennessee statutes. Title 61 Partnerships
Part 7

Partnership Interests

61-2-701. Nature.

A partnership interest is personal property. A partner has no interest in specific limited partnership property.

Acts 1988, ch. 922, § 1.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 20 Tenn. Juris., Partnership, §§ 2, 3.

61-2-702. Assignment.

Unless otherwise provided in the partnership agreement:

A partnership interest is assignable in whole or in part;

An assignment of a partnership interest does not dissolve a limited partnership or entitle the assignee to become or to exercise any rights or powers of a partner;

An assignment entitles the assignee to receive, to the extent assigned, only the distribution to which the assignor would be entitled; and

A partner ceases to be a partner and to have the power to exercise any rights or powers of a partner upon assignment of all of his partnership interest.

The partnership agreement may provide that a partner's interest in a limited partnership may be evidenced by a certificate of partnership interest issued by the limited partnership and may also provide for the assignment or transfer of any partnership interest represented by such a certificate and make other provisions with respect to such certificates.

Unless otherwise provided in a partnership agreement and except to the extent assumed by agreement, until an assignee of a partnership interest becomes a partner, the assignee shall have no liability as a partner solely as a result of the assignment.

Acts 1988, ch. 922, § 1; 1989, ch. 270, § 60.

Law Reviews.

The Tennessee Revised Uniform Limited Partnership Act (Glenn Stophel and James C. Heartfield), 26 No. 5 Tenn. B.J. 22 (1990).

Attorney General Opinions. Taxation of interest in limited partnership, OAG 89-75, 1989 Tenn. AG LEXIS 57 (5/4/89).

61-2-703. Rights of judgment creditor.

On application to a court of competent jurisdiction by any judgment creditor of a partner, the court may charge the partnership interest of the partner with payment of the unsatisfied amount of the judgment with interest. To the extent so charged, the judgment creditor has only the rights of an assignee of the partnership interest. This chapter does not deprive any partner of the benefit of any exemption laws applicable to his partnership interest.

Acts 1988, ch. 922, § 1.

61-2-704. Rights of assignee — Liabilities.

An assignee of a partnership interest, including an assignee of a general partner, may become a limited partner if and to the extent that:

The partnership agreement so provides; or

All partners consent.

An assignee who has become a limited partner has the rights and powers, and is subject to the restrictions and liabilities, of his assignor under the partnership agreement and this chapter. Notwithstanding the foregoing, unless otherwise provided in the partnership agreement, an assignee who becomes a limited partner is liable for the obligations of his assignor to make contributions as provided in § 61-2-502, but shall not be liable for the obligations of his assignor under part 6 of this chapter. However, the assignee is not obligated for liabilities, including the obligations of his assignor to make contributions as provided in § 61-2-502, unknown to the assignee at the time he became a limited partner and the possibility of which could not be ascertained from the partnership agreement.

Whether or not an assignee of a partnership interest becomes a limited partner, the assignor is not released from his liability to the limited partnership under parts 5 and 6 of this chapter.

Acts 1988, ch. 922, § 1; 1989, ch. 270, §§ 61, 62.

Law Reviews.

The Tennessee Revised Uniform Limited Partnership Act (Glenn Stophel and James C. Heartfield), 26 No. 5 Tenn. B.J. 22 (1990).

61-2-705. Deceased or incompetent partners.

If a partner who is an individual dies or a court of competent jurisdiction adjudges him to be incompetent to manage his person or his property, the partner's executor, administrator, guardian, conservator or other legal representative may exercise all of the partner's rights for the purpose of settling his estate or administering his property, including any power under the partnership agreement of an assignee to become a limited partner. The estate of a deceased limited partner shall be liable for all his liabilities as a limited partner. If a partner is a corporation, trust or other entity and is dissolved or terminated, the powers of that partner may be exercised by its legal representative or successor.

Acts 1988, ch. 922, § 1.